Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1441.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102.1(a), (b) and (d) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1102.1. Sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer.(a) First degree murder.--A person who has been convicted after June 24, 2012, of a murder of the first degree, first degree murder of an unborn child or murder of a law enforcement 1234567891011121314151617181920 officer of the first degree and who was under the age of 18 at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was 15 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment [without parole], or a term of imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be at least 35 years to life.(2) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was under 15 years of age shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment [without parole], or a term of imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be at least 25 years to life.(b) Notice.--Reasonable notice to the defendant of the Commonwealth's intention to seek a sentence of life imprisonment [without parole] under subsection (a) shall be provided after conviction and before sentencing.* * *(d) Findings.--In determining whether to impose a sentence of life [without parole] under subsection (a), the court shall consider and make findings on the record regarding the following:* * *Section 2. Section 9714(a)(2) of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.(a) Mandatory sentence.--* * *(2) Where the person had at the time of the commission of the current offense previously been convicted of two or 20250HB1441PN1679 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 more such crimes of violence arising from separate criminal transactions, the person shall be sentenced to a minimum sentence of at least 25 years of total confinement, notwithstanding any other provision of this title or other statute to the contrary. Proof that the offender received notice of or otherwise knew or should have known of the penalties under this paragraph shall not be required. Upon conviction for a third or subsequent crime of violence the court may, if it determines that 25 years of total confinement is insufficient to protect the public safety, sentence the offender to life imprisonment [without parole].* * *Section 3. Section 6137(a)(1) and (3) of Title 61 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--(1) The board may parole subject to consideration of guidelines established under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5 (relating to adoption of guidelines for parole) or subject to section 6137.1 (relating to short sentence parole) and such information developed by or furnished to the board under section 6174 (relating to right of access to offenders), or both, and may release on parole any offender to whom the power to parole is granted to the board by this chapter, except an offender condemned to death [or serving life imprisonment], whenever in its opinion:(i) The best interests of the offender justify or require that the offender be paroled.(ii) It does not appear that the interests of the 20250HB1441PN1679 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth will be injured by the offender's parole.* * *(3) The power to parole granted under this section to the board may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after[, the]:(i) The expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in its sentence or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation.(ii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757 (relating to consecutive sentences of total confinement for multiple offenses), five years after the date of incarceration which, in the case of an offender sentenced to life imprisonment, shall include any period of uninterrupted incarceration occurring prior to trial.* * *(6) The board may not consider or grant parole to any offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102(b) (relating to sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer) where the victim was a law enforcement officer.* * *Section 4. The amendment or addition of the following provisions shall apply to individuals sentenced to imprisonment before, on or after the effective date of this section:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(a), (b) and (d) introductory paragraph.(2) 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(a)(2).(3) 61 Pa.C.S. § 6137(a)(1), (3) and (6).Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1441PN1679 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930